District of Columbia statutes.
8-1041.02

District covered electronics waste diversion goal.

In implementing this chapter, the District shall strive to divert at least 80% of covered electronic equipment waste, estimated based on best available information, to be generated in the District annually from landfill or incineration through recycling or reuse by 2032, and to ensure electronics manufacturer responsibility for the recycling of covered electronic equipment waste.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 116, 61 DCR 9971